epay/epayservices/src/main/resources/com/otextpdf/text/pdf/hyphenation/hyph/lt.xml
	<patterns>
		.ap1
		.api1
		.ap3r
		.arbi1
		.arti1
		.as3p
		.at1
		.ata1
		.at3r
		.aš3v
		.dina1
		.ek3r
		.i2š3
		.iši2
		.kirti1
		.nu1
		.nusi1
		.pie2č
		.sam1
		.sida1
		.sk4
		.st4
		.su5kr
		.te3s2
		.uk3
		.u2š3
		.už1
		.įs4
		.šven1
		a1a2
		a1b
		a1c
		a2ch
		a1d
		a4dra
		a1e
		ae2l
		a1f
		2a1g
		a4gr
		ag3ra
		a5grio
		a5gro
		a1h
		a5inf
		ai4sk
		ai4tr
		a1j
		a1k
		ak2l
		ak2vi
		a2kėt
		a1l
		a3li
		a5lo1
		a3ly
		a3lė
		a3lū
		a1m
		a1n
		an3k2l
		an4sk
		an4tr
		a2o
		a1p
		ap1a4k
		ap3ei
		ap3i2m
		ap3l
		a3pr
		ap3s2
		a1r
		ar1eit
		a4rg
		ari4s
		a1s
		asi1
		asi5s
		a4sk
		as3kl
		a3sl
		as2mi
		as2mu
		a5s4n
		a4stu
		a1t
		at3aug
		ate5ist
		at3i2m
		ato1
		atp4
		a4tru
		at1ė2
		atū2ž
		a4u
		au4kl
		au4sk
		au4sl
		au4t3r
		a1v
		a1w
		a1y
		a1z
		a1ą
		2a1č
		a1ę
		a1ė2
		a1į
		a1š
		a3šn
		aš4tr
		aš2v
		a1ų
		a1ū2
		a1ž
		až2l
		ba3c
		balta1
		ba4sl
		2b1b
		2b1c
		4b3d
		bep4
		be3s2
		besi1
		be3t2
		2b1f
		2b1g
		2b1h
		b1j
		2b1k
		2b1l
		b2la
		b2liz
		3b2lo
		b2lu
		2b1m
		2b1n
		2b1p
		2b2r
		b3ri
		2b1s
		2b3t
		bu4k
		2b1v
		2b1w
		2b1z
		2b1č
		2b1š
		2b1ž
		car4
		2c1b
		2c1c
		2c1d
		2c1f
		2c1g
		3chi
		2c1k
		2c1l
		2c1m
		2c1n
		2c1p
		2c1r
		2c1s
		2c1t
		cu4
		cuk5
		2c1v
		2c1w
		2c1z
		2c1č
		2c1š
		2c1ž
		da3b4
		2d1b
		2d1c
		2d1d
		de4k
		dema1
		de4pr
		de4sp
		2d1f
		2d1g
		2d1h
		di4p
		di4s
		dis5k
		2d1j
		2d3k
		4d3l
		2d1m
		2d1n
		do3ri
		2d1p
		2d1r
		dro1
		dro2b
		d2rė
		4drų
		2d1s
		2d1t
		du2a
		du4k
		du5ka
		du4sl
		2d1v
		d3va
		dvi3a
		2d1w
		d4z
		2d1č
		2d1š
		d4ž
		džio1
		e1a2
		e2a3l
		eapi1
		eat1
		e1b2
		ebe1
		e3bl
		eb3r
		e1c
		e2ch
		e3d2
		ed3ri
		e4dro
		ed3rė
		e1e
		e1f
		e1g
		eg3ra
		e1h
		e1ie
		ei4k3l
		1ein
		ei4sk
		ei4sl
		2eis3t
		eist2ra
		ei2š1
		e1j
		e1k
		e3kr
		e1l
		e1m
		ema5s4
		2e1n
		en3k2l
		enk4la
		eno1
		ens4
		4enta
		enu1
		e2o
		e3or
		e3o2š
		e3p
		ep4li
		ep4r
		epra1
		epri1
		e1r
		ere3a4
		eri4s
		ero1
		erė2
		e1s
		esi5s
		es4k
		eska1
		e5sko
		e3s2v
		e1t
		e1u4
		euž3
		e1v
		e3vi
		e1w
		e1y
		e1z
		e1ą
		e1č
		e1ę
		e1ė
		e1į4
		eįp3
		eįs3k
		eįt3r
		e1š
		e3šn
		eš2v
		ešė3
		e1ų
		e1ū
		e1ž
		2f1b
		2f1c
		2f1d
		2f1f
		2f1g
		2f1h
		fi4s5
		2f1k
		2f1l
		2f1m
		2f1n
		2f1p
		2f1r
		fri1
		2f1s
		2f1t
		2f1v
		2f1w
		2f1z
		2f1č
		2f1š
		2f1ž
		gaš3
		2g1b
		2g1c
		2g1d
		ge4o1
		2g1f
		2g1g
		2g1h
		2g1k
		2g1l
		g2le
		g2lo
		2g1m
		2g1n
		3g2nų
		2g1p2
		3g2r
		grai2
		g3ran
		5g3re
		g4rei
		g3ri
		4g4rio
		g3ro.
		g4rą
		5grį
		4grų
		2g1s
		4g1t
		3gu
		2g1v
		2g1w
		gyva1
		2g1z
		2g1č
		2g1š
		2g1ž
		2h1b
		2h1c
		2h1d
		2h1f
		2h1g
		2h1h
		hi4b
		2h1k
		2h2l
		2h1m
		h2me
		2h1n
		2h1p
		2h1r
		2h1s
		2h1t
		2h1v
		2h1w
		2h1z
		2h1č
		2h1š
		2h1ž
		i2a
		ia5g4
		i3aiš
		ia3k
		i3antę
		i3antė
		iap4
		i3ar
		i3b2
		i1c
		ice1
		i1d
		id2r
		id3rė
		i2dėm
		i2e
		ie4d3r
		ie3g
		i3ei
		ie3kl
		i3ent
		ie4p5r
		ie4sk
		i1f
		2i1g
		i3g2l
		ig3ru
		2i1h
		i1i2
		i1j
		i1k
		i3k2n
		ik3r
		i1l
		ilo1
		i1m
		1imd
		4i1n
		in4kl
		5inv
		i2o
		io4g3r
		iok2
		io4pl
		i3or
		i1p
		i2p1j
		ip3ru
		i1r
		ira3s2
		i3ri
		4i1s
		i5sa
		i5si
		is4k
		i3sl
		is4li
		i5s4n
		i4ste
		isto1
		2i3t2
		i2u
		i1v
		i1w
		i1y
		i1z
		i2ą
		i1č
		i1ę
		i1ė2
		i1į
		i1š
		i3šn
		iš5t
		i4šv
		išė2
		1išš
		i2ų
		i2ū
		i3ž
		3ja.
		jauna1
		2j1b
		2j1c
		2j1d
		2j1f
		2j1g
		2j1h
		2j1j
		2j1k
		2j1l
		2j1m
		2j1n
		jot3
		jo4tv
		2j1p
		2j1r
		2j1s
		2j1t
		1ju
		2j1v
		2j1w
		2j1z
		2j1č
		2j1š
		1jū
		2j1ž
		3ka.
		5ka3d
		kak3
		ka4kl
		ka4pr
		3kar
		3kas
		3kati
		5kav
		kavar1
		ka3z2
		2k1b
		2k1c
		2k1d
		3ke
		ke4b3
		keren1
		2k1f
		2k1g
		2k1h
		k4i
		5ki.
		5kia
		3kib
		3kil
		5kit
		2k1k
		2k1l
		3k2la
		k4lan
		4kle.
		k2lel
		4klo.
		4klu.
		k2ly
		4klą
		4klų
		2k1m
		2k1n
		3ko
		2k1p
		2k2r
		k4rau
		kris2
		kri5st
		k3ro
		k4rov
		4k3ru
		5krun
		k4ry
		k5rą
		2k1s
		k4sk
		ks3l
		k4s3p
		4k1t
		k3ta
		3ku
		4kub
		ku4k
		ku4pr
		2k1v
		k2va
		k3vo
		k2vė
		2k1w
		3kyt
		2k1z
		5ką
		2k1č
		2k1š
		kš2ly
		kšė3
		2k1ž
		3la.
		lap4s3to
		2l1b
		lb3r
		2l1c
		2l1d
		3le.
		le3c
		le4gr
		4leč
		2l1f
		2l1g
		lg3s2t
		2l1h
		3li.
		li4a
		5li4o
		3lių
		2l1j
		2l1k
		lko1
		2l1l
		2l1m
		2l1n
		3lo.
		log4
		4lop
		4l1p
		lpna1
		2l1r
		4l1s
		l4sk
		l4s3p
		4l3t
		3lu.
		2lup
		4l1v
		2l1w
		3lyč
		2l1z
		3lą
		2l1č
		3lęs
		3lėm
		3lės
		2lėč
		3lį4
		4l1š
		3lų
		2l1ž
		m2a
		2m3aid
		3mas
		mas3ki
		2m1b
		mb3r
		2m1c
		2m1d
		me3c
		meis1
		2m1f
		2m1g
		2m1h
		mi4gl
		mi4gr
		min4s
		mi4tr
		2m1k
		2m1l
		2m1m
		2m1n
		m2o
		2mod
		2m1p
		m4pl
		m3pr
		2m1r
		4m1s
		2m1t
		m3ta
		3muo
		2m1v
		2m1w
		2m1z
		2m1č
		2m1š
		2m1ž
		na3s2
		na3t2
		2n1b
		2n1c
		ncen1
		2n1d
		n3drė
		ne1
		neg4
		nei2m
		ne4o3
		neor2
		nerė3
		nesi1
		ne3sl
		ne3s2t
		ne3t2
		neįs3t
		2n1f
		4n1g
		ng3l
		ng4r
		2n1h
		ni4s
		2n1j
		2n1k
		nk3la
		nk3r
		n3kry
		2n1l
		2n1m
		2n1n
		5no
		2n1p
		2n1r
		4n1s
		ns4ku
		ns3l
		n4s3p
		nst3r
		4n1t
		n3ta
		nt4pl
		n3tru
		nt2ruo
		nua4
		nu3b2
		nu3g
		nu1i
		nuk2
		nu4o3
		nuos2
		nu5s4
		2n1v
		2n1w
		2n1z
		4n1č
		2n1š
		2n1ž
		o1a
		o1b
		o1c
		o1d
		o3dr
		o1e
		o2et
		o1f
		o1g
		o1h
		o1i
		o1j
		o1k
		o3kr
		o1l
		olen1
		o1m
		om4pr
		o1n
		ono1
		o1o2
		o1p
		o1r
		o2rie
		ori4s
		or4tr
		o2rę
		o1s
		o3sl
		os3le
		os4lo
		o3s2v
		o3t2
		oto1
		o1v
		o1w
		o1y
		o1z
		o1ą
		o1č
		o1ę
		o1ė
		o1į
		o1š
		oš2v
		o1ų
		o1ū
		o1ž
		pa3
		pad2
		pai2l
		pai2m
		pai2r
		3pan
		pap4
		p2ar
		parsi1
		pa4r1ė2
		pas2
		pa5sr
		p2at2
		2p1b
		4p1c
		4p3d2
		p2e
		per1
		pe2re
		pe2r3im
		per3s
		pe2rė
		2p1f
		2p1g
		2p1h
		p2i
		p3ieš
		2p3k2
		3p2l
		p3le
		p3li
		4plio
		p4liu
		p3lo
		p4loj
		p4lu
		p4ly
		2p1m
		4p1n
		3po
		po4g
		poli1
		2p1p
		2p2r
		p3rai
		prau2si
		p3raš
		p3ri
		pris2
		p5ro.
		p3rom
		p3ry
		4prą
		p3rė
		p3rū
		4p1s
		psi1
		p5s4k
		p4s3ty
		p3s2v
		4p3t2
		3p4u
		pusiau1
		pu4sk
		pu4sl
		pu4tr
		2p1v
		2p1w
		p2y
		2p1z
		2p1č
		p2ė
		4p3š2
		4p3ž
		r2a
		3ra.
		ra3b
		3rac
		ra1im
		rai4tį
		ra3kr
		3ral
		3ram
		ras4l
		ra3sm
		rau4ka.
		3rav
		2r1b
		rbo1
		r3b4r
		2r1c
		4r1d
		2reb
		4rein
		4reit
		3rel
		re4p5
		5res
		res3l
		3ret
		2r1f
		2r1g
		2r1h
		r2i
		3ri.
		ri3d
		3rij
		ri3kr
		2ril
		ri2ma.
		2r3imt
		3rio
		ri3p
		risi1
		ri3st
		rivin1
		3rią
		3rių
		2riū
		4r1k
		rk3ly
		r3k4r
		4r1l
		2r1m
		4r1n
		r2o
		3rod2
		ro4gr
		3roj
		3rok
		3ron
		3rop
		2r3org
		5ros
		2r1p
		r3p4r
		2r1r
		4r1s
		rs4ko.
		rs4p
		4r1t
		rti5k4
		rti3s2
		r3t2r
		r3t2v
		r2u
		2ruk
		3rul
		4run
		3ruos
		2rup
		3rus
		ru4sk
		4ruto
		4r1v
		2r1w
		2r1z
		3rą
		4rąs
		4r1č
		4r1š
		r3š2l
		r3š2m
		5rų
		2r1ž
		sala1
		2s1amž
		san5t
		sarka1
		2s3b
		2s1c
		2s3d
		s2e
		se4kr
		senat4
		2s1f
		2s1g
		2s1h
		si3auk
		si3a2v
		si3a2š
		si3d
		si3k4
		si3p4
		si3s2
		si5š2v
		3s2k2
		4sk.
		s5ka.
		4ske
		5s4ken
		5ski
		5s4kle
		5sk4r
		5skub
		sk3va
		sk3vi
		5sky
		4ską
		5skę
		2s2l
		3sle
		s3li
		s3lo
		4s3lu
		4s3lū
		2s1m
		4sme.
		4smę
		4s3n
		so4dr
		3s2p
		s3pe
		4spn
		4spu
		4s1r
		s3ri
		2s1s
		2s1t
		s2tal
		s2ten
		4stin
		s2tod
		s2toj
		3s2tov
		st2rai
		st2v
		4stę
		4s3tė
		4stų
		s2tū
		su1
		su3bl
		su3d2
		su3g2
		suk2l
		su3s2
		susi1
		suž4
		2s1v
		s2ve
		3s2vy
		2s1w
		2s1z
		są3
		4s3č
		5sė
		2s1š
		2s1ž
		t2a
		2tab
		ta3kr
		ta5s
		2tat
		taura1
		2tač
		2t1b
		2t1c
		2t1d
		2teb
		3tem
		te4o
		te3t2
		2t1f
		4t3g
		2t1h
		t2i
		ti4gr
		ti4k3l
		3tin
		2tip
		4t3j
		4t3k
		t4kl
		4t3l
		4t3m
		2t1n
		t2o
		3toje
		2tolį
		to3s2
		2tow
		2t3p
		t4pj
		tp3lū
		tp4r
		2t1r
		4trio
		t2riš
		4tro
		4trą
		4trų
		4t3s4
		tsi1
		tskri1
		4t1t
		tua4
		3tur
		2t1v
		t2vo
		4tvėj
		2t1w
		3tyd
		2t1z
		2t1č
		3tę
		t2ėm
		t3ėmu
		t3ėmę
		t3ėmė
		2t3š2
		2t3ž
		u1a2
		u3ai
		u1b
		u2bj
		u1c
		u1d
		u1e2
		u1f
		u1g
		ug4r
		ug5rio
		u1h
		u1i2m
		u5in
		ui2r
		u1j
		u1k
		u3kl
		uk2le
		u3kr
		u3kv
		u5kų
		u1l
		u1m
		u1n
		u2o
		u3or
		uo4sl
		u3p
		up4l
		up3ro
		u1r
		urk2
		ur3kl
		u5ro1
		ur3s2
		u1s
		u2s1al
		u3sl
		us3la
		us3le
		usva1
		us3ve
		u3t2
		uto1
		2utr
		u1u
		u1v
		u1w
		u1y
		u1z
		u1ą
		u1č
		u1ę
		u1ė2
		u1į
		u1š
		u3š2l
		u3š2n
		uš2v
		u1ų
		u1ū2
		u1ž
		uži2m
		u3žl
		už3v
		už1ė2
		3va.
		vap4
		va3t
		2v1b
		2v1c
		2v1d
		v2e
		2vep
		3ves
		2v1f
		2v1g
		2v1h
		viesia1
		vi4s5k
		vi4t3r
		2v1j
		2v1k
		2v1l
		2v1m
		2v1n
		2v1p
		2v1r
		2v4s
		2v1t
		2v1v
		2v1w
		2vydau
		2v1z
		3vą
		2v1č
		3vė
		4vėp
		2v1š
		2v1ž
		2w1b
		2w1c
		2w1d
		2w1f
		2w1g
		2w1h
		2w1k
		2w1l
		2w1m
		2w1n
		2w1p
		2w1r
		2w1s
		2w1t
		2w1v
		2w1w
		2w1z
		2w1č
		2w1š
		2w1ž
		y1a
		y1b
		y1c
		y1d
		y1e
		y1f
		y1g
		ygia1
		y1h
		y1i
		y1j
		y1k
		y4k3l
		y1l
		y1m
		y1n
		y1o
		y1p
		y3r
		y1s
		y4sk
		y1t
		y1u
		y1v
		y1w
		y1y
		y1z
		y1ą
		y1č
		y1ę
		y1ė
		y1į
		y1š
		y1ų
		y1ū
		y1ž
		2z1b
		2z1c
		2z1d
		2z1f
		2z1g
		2z1h
		2z1k
		2z1l
		2z1m
		2z1n
		2z1p
		2z1r
		2z1s
		2z1t
		2z1v
		2z1w
		2z1z
		2z1č
		2z1š
		2z1ž
		ą1a
		ą1b
		ą1c
		ą1d
		ą1e
		ą1f
		ą1g
		ą1h
		ą1i
		ą1j
		ą1k
		ą1l
		ą1m
		ą1n
		ą1o
		ą1p
		ą1r
		ą1s
		ą1t
		ą1u
		ą1v
		ą1w
		ą1y
		ą1z
		ą1ą
		ą1č
		ą1ę
		ą1ė
		ą1į
		ą1š
		ą1ų
		ą1ū
		ą1ž
		2č1b
		2č1c
		2č1d
		čeko1
		2č1f
		2č1g
		2č1h
		čin1
		2č1k
		2č1l
		2č1m
		2č1n
		2č1p
		2č1r
		2č1s
		2č1t
		2č1v
		2č1w
		2č1z
		2č1č
		2č1š
		2č1ž
		ę1a
		ę1b
		ę1c
		ę1d
		ę1e
		ę1f
		ę1g
		ę1h
		ę1i
		ę1j
		ę1k
		ę1l
		ę1m
		ę1n
		ę1o
		ę1p
		ę1r
		ę1s
		ę1t
		ę1u
		ę1v
		ę1w
		ę1y
		ę1z
		ę1ą
		ę1č
		ę1ę
		ę1ė
		ę1į
		ę1š
		ę1ų
		ę1ū
		ę1ž
		ė1a
		ė1b
		ė1c
		ė1d
		ė1e
		ė1f
		ė1g
		ė1h
		ė1i
		ė1j
		ė1k
		ė4k3l
		2ė3l
		ė1m
		ė3me
		ė1n
		ė1o
		ė1p
		ė1r
		2ė1s
		ės3l
		2ė3t
		ė4tr
		ė1u
		ė1v
		ė1w
		ė1y
		ė1z
		ė1ą
		ė1č
		ė1ę
		ė1ė
		ė1į
		ė1š
		ė1ų
		ė1ū
		ė1ž
		į1a
		į1b
		į1c
		į1d2
		į2e
		į1f
		į4g
		į1h
		į1i
		į1j
		į2k4
		į2l
		į2m
		į1n
		į1o
		į4p
		į2r
		į1s
		įsi1
		įs3l
		įs2m
		įs2r
		įst2
		į2t2
		į1u
		į2v
		į1w
		į1y
		į1z
		į1ą
		į1č
		į1ę
		į1ė2
		į1į
		į1š
		į1ų
		į1ū
		į1ž
		2š1b2
		2š1c
		2š3d2
		š1ei
		še2v
		2š1f
		2š1g4
		2š1h
		2š5ist
		šiuk1
		2š1k2
		2š1l
		š2lij
		š2lu
		3šly
		2š1m
		2š1n
		š2ne
		šno1
		šo2r
		2š1p4
		2š1r
		2š3s4
		šsi1
		šsikap1
		4š3t2
		šu4š
		3š1v
		š2vi
		š4vyd
		2š1w
		2š1z
		4š3č
		šė2j
		2š1š
		2š1ž
		ų1a
		ų1b
		ų1c
		ų1d
		ų1e
		ų1f
		ų1g
		ų1h
		ų1i
		ų1j
		ų1k
		ų1l
		ų1m
		ų1n
		ų1o
		ų1p
		ų1r
		ų1s
		ų1t
		ų1u
		ų1v
		ų1w
		ų1y
		ų1z
		ų1ą
		ų1č
		ų1ę
		ų1ė
		ų1į
		ų1š
		ų1ų
		ų1ū
		ų1ž
		ū1a
		ū1b
		ū1c
		ū1d
		ū1e
		ū1f
		ū1g
		ū1h
		ū1i
		ū1j
		ū1k
		ū4k3l
		ū1l
		ū1m
		ū1n
		ū1o
		ū1p
		ū1r
		ū1s
		ū4s3k
		ūs3l
		ūs3t
		ū1t
		ū1u
		ū1v
		ū1w
		ū1y
		ū1z
		ū1ą
		ū1č
		ū1ę
		ū1ė
		ū1į
		ū1š
		ū1ų
		ū1ū
		ū1ž
		žant4
		žants5
		2ž3b2
		2ž1c
		2ž3d2
		žen1
		2ž3f4
		2ž3g
		2ž1h
		ži3mu
		žio3
		ž1j
		2ž3k2
		2ž1l
		ž2lu
		4ž1m
		2ž1n
		2ž3p
		2ž1r
		2ž1s
		žsi1
		ž4sk
		ž4s5l
		žs3t
		4ž3t2
		ž2u
		žu3s2
		3ž2v
		ž4vi
		ž3vo
		2ž1w
		2ž1z
		2ž1č
		žįs3
		2ž1š
		2ž1ž
	</patterns>

</hyphenation-info>
